Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-2635
Rules and regulations.

The director may adopt and promulgate reasonable rules and regulations for the implementation and administration of sections 44-2606 to 44-2635.

Laws 1980, LB 481, § 30;

Laws 1989, LB 92, § 215.